Washington statutes.
RCW 18.170.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Armed private security guard" means a private security guard who has a current firearms certificate issued by the commission and is licensed as an armed private security guard under this chapter.

(2) "Armored vehicle guard" means a person who transports in an armored vehicle under armed guard, from one place to another place, valuables, jewelry, currency, documents, or any other item that requires secure delivery.

(3) "Burglar alarm response runner" means a person employed by a private security company to respond to burglar alarm system signals.

(4) "Burglar alarm system" means a device or an assembly of equipment and devices used to detect or signal unauthorized intrusion, movement, or exit at a protected premises, other than in a vehicle, to which police or private security guards are expected to respond.

(5) "Chief law enforcement officer" means the elected or appointed police administrator of a municipal, county, or state police or sheriff's department that has full law enforcement powers in its jurisdiction.

(6) "Classroom instruction" means training that takes place in a setting where individuals receiving training are assembled together and learn through lectures, study papers, class discussion, textbook study, or other means of organized formal education techniques, such as video, closed circuit, or other forms of electronic means, and as distinguished from individual instruction.

(7) "Commission" means the criminal justice training commission established in chapter 43.101 RCW.

(8) "Department" means the department of licensing.

(9) "Department-certified trainer" means any person who has been approved by the department by receiving a passing score on a department-administered examination, to administer department-provided examinations and attest that training or testing requirements have been met.

(10) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.

(11) "Employer" includes any individual, firm, corporation, partnership, association, company, society, manager, contractor, subcontractor, bureau, agency, service, office, or an agent of any of the foregoing that employs or seeks to enter into an arrangement to employ any person as a private security guard.

(12) "Firearms certificate" means the certificate issued by the commission.

(13) "Individual instruction" means training that takes place either on-the-job or through formal education techniques, such as video, closed circuit, internet, or other forms of electronic means, and as distinguished from classroom instruction.

(14) "Licensee" means a person granted a license required by this chapter.

(15) "Person" includes any individual, firm, corporation, partnership, association, company, society, manager, contractor, subcontractor, bureau, agency, service, office, or an agent or employee of any of the foregoing.

(16) "Primary responsibility" means activity that is fundamental to, and required or expected in, the regular course of employment and is not merely incidental to employment.

(17) "Principal corporate officer" means the president, vice president, treasurer, secretary, comptroller, or any other person who performs the same functions for the corporation as performed by these officers.

(18) "Private security company" means a person or entity licensed under this chapter and engaged in the business of providing the services of private security guards on a contractual basis.

(19) "Private security guard" means an individual who is licensed under this chapter and principally employed as or typically referred to as one of the following:

(a) Security officer or guard;

(b) Patrol or merchant patrol service officer or guard;

(c) Armed escort or bodyguard;

(d) Armored vehicle guard;

(e) Burglar alarm response runner; or

(f) Crowd control officer or guard.

(20) "Qualifying agent" means an officer or manager of a corporation who meets the requirements set forth in this chapter for obtaining a license to own or operate a private security company.

(21) "Sworn peace officer" means a person who is an employee of the federal government, the state, a political subdivision, agency, or department branch of a municipality, or other unit of local government, and has law enforcement powers.

[ 2007 c 306 s 1; 2007 c 154 s 1; 2004 c 50 s 1; 1991 c 334 s 1.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2007 c 154 s 1 and by 2007 c 306 s 1, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).